Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
68-1929
Aggrieved party; hearing; petition.

A nursing
facility or skilled nursing facility aggrieved by an action of the department
under the Nursing Facility Quality Assurance Assessment Act may file a petition
for hearing with the director of the Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care
of the department. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act and rules and regulations of the department.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 29.
July 1, 2011
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.